Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-816
Authority; keep records and accounts; seal; certified copies.

The executive director, assistant executive director, or
any other person designated by resolution of the authority shall keep records
and accounts of all proceedings and financial dealings of the authority, shall
be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority,
the minute book or journal of the authority, and its official seal, and shall
be custodian of all funds of the authority. The executive director, assistant
executive director, or other designated person may cause copies to be made
of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority and may give
certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such
copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely
upon such certificates.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2913;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1713;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 16.